src/common/backend/tsearch/dicts/hunspell_sample.affix
COMPOUNDFLAG Z
ONLYINCOMPOUND L

PFX B Y 1
PFX B   0	re	.

PFX U N 1
PFX U   0	un	.

SFX J Y 1
SFX J   0	INGS	[^E]

SFX G Y 1
SFX G   0	ING		[^E]

SFX S Y 1
SFX S   0	S	[^SXZHY]

SFX A Y 1
SFX A   Y	IES	[^AEIOU]Y

SFX \ N 1
SFX \   0	Y/L	[^Y]
